Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2306
Class B license; application; fee; exceptions.

(1) Any person desiring to be issued a Class B license under section 39-2308 shall apply to the board of examiners upon forms prescribed and furnished by the board. Such application shall be accompanied by an application fee of twenty-five dollars.

(2) Any professional engineer licensed pursuant to the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act shall be entitled to a Class B license under section 39-2308 without examination.

Laws 1969, c. 144, § 6, p. 667;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 61;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 94;

Laws 2003, LB 500, § 6;

Laws 2021, LB174, § 7.

Engineers and Architects Regulation Act, see section 81-3401.